District of Columbia statutes.
1-609.55

Management Supervisory Service skills maintenance and enhancement.

Management Supervisory Service employees shall be required to maintain and enhance their management and supervisory skills.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 955
as added June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(k), 45 DCR 2464
1981 Ed., § 1-610.55.
Applicability of § 101(k) of D.C. Law 12-124: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-609.51.